ru: Поддержка пронации: Нейтральная; Гиперпронация; Гипопронация; Другое
zh-TW: 足部內旋支撐: 中性; 過度內旋; 內旋不足; 其他
pl: Wsparcie pronacji: Neutralne; Nadpronacja; Supinacja; Inne
sv: Pronationsstöd: Neutral; Överpronation; Underpronation; Övrigt
sk-SK: Podpora pronácie: Neutrálna; Nadmerná pronácia (Overpronácia); Nedostatočná pronácia (Supinácia); Iná
lt-LT: Pronacijos palaikymas: Neutralus; Perteklinė pronacija; Nepakankama pronacija; Kita
es: Soporte de pronación: Neutro; Sobrepronación; Supinación; Otro
vi: Hỗ trợ chống lật bàn chân: Trung tính; Lệch trong; Lệch ngoài; Khác
pt-BR: Pronação suporte: Neutro; Pronação excessiva; Subpronação; Outro
hu: Pronációs támogatás: Semleges; Túlpronálás; Alulpronálás; Egyéb
nb: Pronasjonsstøtte: Nøytral; Overpronasjon; Underpronasjon; Annet
pt-PT: Suporte à pronação: Neutro; Excesso de pronação; Subpronação; Outro
ja: 回内サポート: ニュートラル; オーバープロネーション; アンダープロネーション; その他
bg-BG: Поддръжка на пронацията: Неутрален; Свръхпронация; Супинация (подпронация); Друго
fi: Pronaatiotuki: Neutraali; Ylipronaatio; Alipronaatio; Muu
da: Pronationsstøtte: Neutral; Overpronation; Underpronation; Anden
th: ความช่วยเหลือด้านการออกเสียง: เท้าปกติ; เท้าแบน; เท้าโก่ง; อื่นๆ
nl: Pronatie ondersteuning: Neutraal; Overpronatie; Onderpronatie; Anders
de: Pronationsunterstützung: Neutral; Überpronation; Unterpronation; Sonstige
zh-CN: 足内旋支撑: 中性; 过度内旋; 内旋不足; 其他
it: Supporto alla pronazione: Neutro; Iperpronazione; Ipopronazione; Altro
sl-SI: Podpora proti pronaciji: Nevtralna; Prekomerna pronacija; Premajšna pronacija (supinacija); Drugo
en: Pronation support: Neutral; Overpronation; Underpronation; Other
hr-HR: Podrška za pronaciju: Neutralno; Prekomjerna pronacija; Supinacija (nedovoljna pronacija); Ostalo
tr: Pronasyon desteği: Nötr; Aşırı pronasyon; Yetersiz pronasyon; Diğer
el: Υποστήριξη πρηνισμού: Ουδέτερο; Υπερπρηνισμός; Υποπρηνισμός; Άλλο
ro-RO: Asistență la pronație: Neutru; Suprapronație; Subpronație; Altele
cs: Pronační podpora: Neutrální; Nadměrná pronace; Supinace; Ostatní
fr: Soutien de la pronation: Neutre; Surpronation; Sous-pronation; Autre
ko: 회내 지원: 중립; 과회내; 과회외; 기타